Tennessee statutes. Title 21 Proceedings In Chancery
Part 7

Rules and Orders of Clerk and Master

21-1-701. Powers of clerk and master.

The clerk and master may, at the clerk and master's office:

Receive and enter on the rules the suggestion and proof of a party's death, and order and issue the necessary process to revive;

Make orders for publication against defendants in cases in which publication is allowed in lieu of personal service;

Take bills for confessed, and set aside the orders pro confesso, upon good cause shown and the filing of a sufficient answer;

Appoint guardians ad litem for infants, upon its being made to appear, by affidavit, that they have no general guardian;

Make orders for the taking of depositions, where those orders are necessary; and

Open causes for proof, on good cause shown, after they have been set for hearing, in the same way the chancellor might do.

Code 1858, § 4420 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 22, § 1; 1845-1846, ch. 122, §§ 7-9); Shan., § 6232; mod. Code 1932, § 10515; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-901.

Cross-References. Clerks and masters, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 53.05.

Clerk's fees, § 8-21-401.

Depositions, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 26, 27.

Order of publication in lieu of personal service, §§ 21-1-204, 21-1-205.

Regulation of proceedings by chancellor, § 21-1-106.

Rule to appear and defend, § 21-1-204.

Substitution of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 25.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 63, 148, 631, 634.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 58; 18 Tenn. Juris., Minors, § 17.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

21-1-702. Entry of proceedings by clerk and master.

Rules, notices, orders and other proceedings in a cause, made with or by the clerk and master, shall be entered by the clerk and master in a well-bound book, to be kept for that purpose, each entry to be made in order and with the correct dates attached.

Code 1858, § 4417 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 12); Shan., § 6229; Code 1932, § 10512; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-902.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 642.

21-1-703. Time of proceedings.

The rules, notices and proceedings described in § 21-7-702 shall be made at the rule days, unless otherwise authorized by this code.

Code 1858, § 4418; Shan., § 6230; Code 1932, § 10513; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-903.

Cross-References. Rule days, § 21-1-705.

Cited: Bailey v. Schubert, 203 Tenn. 660, 315 S.W.2d 249, 1958 Tenn. LEXIS 232 (1958).

21-1-704. Insertion in rule docket.

All rules or orders taken at any one (1) court shall be inserted in the rule docket by the first rule day that is more than twenty (20) days after the term.

Code 1858, § 4419 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 12); Shan., § 6231; Code 1932, § 10514; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-904.

21-1-705. Rule days.

Each day of a regular, special or adjourned term of the court of chancery, and also the first and third Mondays of every month in vacation, is a rule day.

Code 1858, § 4421 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 365, § 2); Shan., § 6233; Acts 1921, ch. 163, § 1; Code 1932, § 10516; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-905.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 87.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Cited: Harris v. Bogle, 115 Tenn. 701, 92 S.W. 849, 1905 Tenn. LEXIS 99 (1906); Bailey v. Schubert, 203 Tenn. 660, 315 S.W.2d 249, 1958 Tenn. LEXIS 232 (1958).

21-1-706. Notice of proceedings by clerk.

The clerk and master shall give to the opposite party, or the opposite party's solicitor, notice of any rule, order or other proceeding taken at the clerk and master's office, affecting the party.

Code 1858, § 4423; Shan., § 6235; Code 1932, § 10520; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-906.

21-1-707. Notice of alteration of rules and orders.

The clerk and master shall not set aside, modify or alter any rule or order of the chancellor, where that power is given by this code; or any rule or order of the clerk and master's own at office without reasonable notice to the opposite party or the opposite party's solicitor.

Code 1858, § 4424; Shan., § 6236; Code 1932, § 10521; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-907.